District of Columbia statutes.
26-308

Granting of license; investigations.

(a)

Upon the filing of an application in proper form, including the required fee and accompanying documents, the Superintendent [Commissioner] shall issue to the applicant a license to engage in the cashing of checks in the District of Columbia, unless the Superintendent [Commissioner] finds that the requirements prescribed by subsection (b) of this section and §§ 26-304, 26-305, 26-306, and 26-307 have not been met.

(b)

The financial responsibility, conditions, and business experience of the applicant or licensee must be such as to warrant the belief that the applicant’s business will be conducted honestly and carefully. The Superintendent [Commissioner] may investigate and consider the qualifications of the applicant or licensee (including the officers and directors of the applicant) in determining whether the requirement has been met.

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-111, § 9, 45 DCR 1782
This section is referenced in § 26-316.
1981 Ed., § 26-1108.